Connecticut, session 2026, SB00332.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Subsection (b) of section 7-148b of the 2026 supplement to
2 the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
3 thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
4 (b) Any municipality may, and each municipality with a population
5 of fifteen thousand or more, as determined by the most recent decennial
6 census, shall, through its legislative body, adopt an ordinance that (1)
7 creates a fair rent commission, (2) establishes or joins the municipality
8 in a joint fair rent commission pursuant to subsection (d) of this section,
9 or (3) joins the municipality in a regional fair rent commission pursuant
10 to subsection (e) of this section. Any such commission shall make
11 studies and investigations, conduct hearings and receive complaints
12 relative to rental charges on housing accommodations, except those
13 accommodations rented on a seasonal basis, within its jurisdiction,
14 which term shall include mobile manufactured homes and mobile
sSB332 / File No. 207 1

sSB332 File No. 207
15 manufactured home park lots, in order to control and eliminate
16 excessive rental charges on such accommodations, and to carry out the
17 provisions of sections 7-148b to 7-148f, inclusive, section 47a-20 and
18 subsection (b) of section 47a-23c. The commission, for such purposes,
19 may compel the attendance of persons at hearings, issue subpoenas and
20 administer oaths, issue orders and continue, review, amend, terminate
21 or suspend any of its orders and decisions. The commission may be
22 empowered to retain legal counsel to advise it. In any hearing of the
23 commission, such commission shall notify the parties to such hearing of
24 their rights under such hearing and the scope of such commission's
25 lawful authority (1) in writing before the commencement of a hearing,
26 and (2) in an announcement at the beginning of each hearing. The
27 Commissioner of Housing shall create a model written notice and
28 announcement and make such models available on the Department of
29 Housing's Internet web site. All hearings conducted pursuant to this
30 section shall be open to the public.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 7-148b(b)
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
The new language was moved for consistency with standard drafting
conventions.
HSG Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sSB332 / File No. 207 2

sSB332 File No. 207
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact:
Municipalities Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Various Municipalities Potential Minimal Minimal
Cost
Explanation
The bill requires fair rent commissions to notify parties of certain
rights. This may result in a potential minimal cost to municipalities
beginning in FY 27 for additional printing and postage costs.
The bill additionally requires the Department of Housing to create
and post online a model notice, which can be done without cost.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to the number of notices.
sSB332 / File No. 207 3

sSB332 File No. 207
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 332
AN ACT CONCERNING NOTICE TO PARTIES BEFORE A FAIR
RENT COMMISSION.